District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-408

Penalty for assaulting, beating, or fighting on account of money won by gaming.

Repealed.

History

9 Anne, ch. 14, § 8, 1710
Kilty’s Rept., p. 248
Alex. Brit. Stat., p. 692
Comp. Stat. D.C., p. 245, § 17
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 4, 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 4, 50 DCR 10996

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-508.
1973 Ed., § 22-508.